Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201160-3,190
Motor vehicle fee; fee schedules;
Motor Vehicle Fee Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) A motor
vehicle fee is imposed on all motor vehicles registered for operation in this
state. An owner of a motor vehicle which is exempt from the imposition of
a motor vehicle tax pursuant to section 60-3,185 shall also be exempt from
the imposition of the motor vehicle fee imposed pursuant to this section.

(2) The county treasurer or designated county official shall annually
determine the motor vehicle fee on each motor vehicle registered in the county
based on the age of the motor vehicle pursuant to this section and cause a
notice of the amount of the fee to be mailed to the registrant at the address
shown upon his or her registration certificate. The notice shall be printed
on a form prescribed by the department, shall be combined with the notice
of the motor vehicle tax, and shall be mailed on or before the first day of
the last month of the registration period.

(3) The motor vehicle fee schedules are set out in this subsection and
subsection (4) of this section. Except for automobiles with a value when new
of less than $20,000, and for assembled automobiles, the fee shall be calculated
by multiplying the base fee times the fraction which corresponds to the age
category of the automobile as shown in the following table:

YEAR
FRACTION

First through fifth
1.00

Sixth through tenth
.70

Eleventh and over
.35

(4) The base fee shall be:

(a) Automobiles, with a value when new of less than $20,000, and assembled
automobiles — $5

(b) Automobiles, with a value when new of $20,000 through $39,999 — $20

(c) Automobiles, with a value when new of $40,000 or more — $30

(d) Motorcycles — $10

(e) Recreational vehicles and cabin trailers — $10

(f) Trucks over seven tons and buses — $30

(g) Trailers other than semitrailers — $10

(h) Semitrailers — $30

(i) Minitrucks — $10

(j) Low-speed vehicles
— $10.

(5) The motor vehicle tax, motor vehicle fee,
and registration fee shall be paid to the county treasurer or designated official
prior to the registration of the motor vehicle for the following registration
period. After retaining one percent of the motor vehicle fee collected for
costs, the remaining proceeds shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund. The State Treasurer shall return funds
from the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund remitted by a county treasurer or designated
county official which are needed for refunds or credits authorized by law.

(6)(a) The Motor Vehicle Fee Fund is created. On or before the last
day of each calendar quarter, the State Treasurer shall distribute all funds
in the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund as follows: (i) Fifty percent to the county
treasurer of each county, amounts in the same proportion as the most recent
allocation received by each county from the Highway Allocation Fund; and (ii)
fifty percent to the treasurer of each municipality, amounts in the same proportion
as the most recent allocation received by each municipality from the Highway
Allocation Fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(b) Funds from the Motor Vehicle Fee Fund shall be considered local
revenue available for matching state sources.

(c) All receipts by counties and municipalities from the Motor Vehicle
Fee Fund shall be used for road, bridge, and street purposes.

(7) For purposes of subdivisions (4)(a), (b), (c), and (f) of this section,
automobiles or trucks includes all trucks and combinations of trucks or truck-tractors,
except those trucks, trailers, or semitrailers registered under section 60-3,198,
and the fee is based on the gross vehicle weight rating as reported by the
manufacturer.

(8) Current model year vehicles are designated as first-year motor vehicles
for purposes of the schedules.

(9) When a motor vehicle is registered which is newer than the current
model year by the manufacturer's designation, the motor vehicle is subject
to the initial motor vehicle fee for six registration periods.

(10) Assembled vehicles other than assembled automobiles shall follow
the schedules for the motor vehicle body type.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 190;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 55;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 29;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 23.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.